California, session 20252026, AB239.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 50350) is added to Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: CHAPTER 11. State-Led County of Los Angeles Disaster Housing Task Force50350. (a) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall convene a state-led County of Los Angeles disaster housing task force for the purpose of coordinating and streamlining efforts between the Department of Housing and Community Development, Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), Office of Emergency Services, and local governments to rebuild housing in communities impacted by the wildfire.(b) The task force shall include representatives of all of the following:(1) The Department of Housing and Community Development.(2) The Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA).(3) The Office of Emergency Services.(4) The City of Los Angeles.(5) The County of Los Angeles.(c) The task force shall appoint a state disaster housing coordinator, to be housed within the Department of Housing and Community Development, to accelerate the delivery of resources, including, but not limited to, funding and technical assistance, to communities impacted by the wildfire. (d) (1) On April 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the task force shall report to the Legislature on the status of rebuilding housing in communities impacted by the wildfire.(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) For the purposes of this section, “wildfire” means the wildfires that began on January 7, 2025, in the County of Los Angeles.50351. This chapter shall remain in effect only until June 30, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique need to coordinate and streamline efforts to rebuild housing in communities in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura impacted by the wildfires that began on January 7, 2025, in the County of Los Angeles.SEC. 3. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:The immediate need to coordinate and streamline efforts to rebuild housing in communities in the Counties of Los Angeles and Ventura impacted by the wildfires that began on January 7, 2025, in the County of Los Angeles.